Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-4741
Hearing screening; department; duties.

The Department of Health and Human Services, in consultation with the State Department of Education, birthing facilities, and other providers, shall develop approved screening methods and protocol for statewide hearing screening tests of substantially all newborns and infants.

Laws 2000, LB 950, § 8;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 48;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 595;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 118;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 24.